Massachusetts, session 194th, H1951.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting the following:- 
Section 131Z. (a) There shall be an Extreme Risk Protection Order study commission, 
within the executive office of public safety and security, hereinafter referred to as the board, 
comprised of 7 members: the director of the firearms record bureau within the department of 
criminal justice information services or designee, who shall serve as chair; the attorney general 
or designee; 1 member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who shall not be 
a member of the general court and shall have demonstrated knowledge or expertise in firearm 
safety, law or technology; 1 member appointed by the president of the senate who shall not be a 
member of the general court and shall have demonstrated knowledge or expertise in firearm 
safety, law or technology; 1 member appointed by the governor; 1 shall be appointed by the Gun 
Owners Action League, Inc. and 1 of whom shall be a police chief selected from a list of four 

of 2 13 chiefs provided by the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association Incorporated; and the armorer 
of the department of state police or designee. 
(b) The board shall examine the effectiveness, frequency and disposition of cases related 
to, the Commonwealth’s extreme risk protection order law and produce a report of their findings 
by February 28th of the year following the previous year’s report. The board members shall 
serve without compensation; provided, however, that members shall be reimbursed for any usual 
and customary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The executive office of 
public safety and security, in consultation with the board, shall adopt operating rules and 
procedures for its organization and activities.